src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! Verb inflection
!! ---------------
!! Võro language verbs inflect for person and number.

LEXICON V_EI
+V+Neg+Prs:i # ;
+V+Neg+Prt:s # ;
+V+Neg+Prt:siq # ;

LEXICON V_48KASUMA
!! There are other verbs here, cf. V_ELÄMÄ
!! * Yaml: __V-kasuma48__
+V: BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V:%^StrGStem V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V:%^StrGStem V0-IND-PRT-SCSG3_i ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V: BACK_INF_ma ;
+V:%^StrGStem BACK_INF_ZEROq ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nuq ;
+V: BACK_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_tav ;
+V:%^VowRM%>õ%^WGStem BACK_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;

LEXICON V_48PALAMA
!! There are other verbs here, cf. V_ELÄMÄ
!! * Yaml: __V-palama48__
+V: BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V:%^StrGStem V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V:%^StrGStem V0-IND-PRT-SCSG3_i ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V: BACK_INF_ma ;
+V:%^StrGStem BACK_INF_ZEROq ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nuq ;
+V: BACK_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_tav ;
+V:%^VowRM%>õ%^WGStem BACK_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;

LEXICON V_48ELÄMÄ
!! There are other verbs here, cf. V_ELÄMÄ
!! * Yaml: ____
+V: FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V:%^StrGStem V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V:%^StrGStem V0-IND-PRT-SCSG3_i ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V: FRONT_INF_mä ;
+V:%^StrGStem FRONT_INF_ZEROq ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nüq ;
+V: FRONT_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_täv ;
+V:%^VowRM%>e%^WGStem FRONT_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;

LEXICON V_ELÄMÄ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ elämä:elä
!! * Yaml: __elaemae48__
+V: FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V:%^StrGStem V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V:%^StrGStem V0-IND-PRT-SCSG3_i ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V: FRONT_INF_mä ;
+V:%^StrGStem FRONT_INF_ZEROq ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nüq ;
+V: FRONT_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_täv ;
+V:%^VowRM%>e%^WGStem FRONT_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;

LEXICON V_49LÕPMA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ 
+V+WORK: # ;

LEXICON V_50TONISÕMA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ tonisõma:tonis
!! * Yaml: __toniswma50__
+V:õ BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V:õ BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V:õ BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V: V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
+V:õ BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V: V0-IND-PRT-SCSG3_i ;
+V:%{XC%} BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-SCPL3_vaq ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V:õ BACK_INF_ma ;
+V: BACK_INF_daq ;
+V:õ BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V:%^VOWLower BACK_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nuq ;
+V: BACK_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_tav ;
+V:%^WGStem BACK_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;

LEXICON V_50HELISEMÄ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ helisemä:helis
!! * Yaml: __helisemae50__
+V:e FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V:e FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V:e FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V: V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
+V:e FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V: V0-IND-PRT-SCSG3_i ;
+V:%{XC%} FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-SCPL3_väq ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V:e FRONT_INF_mä ;
+V: FRONT_INF_däq ;
+V:e FRONT_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V:%^VOWLower FRONT_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nüq ;
+V: FRONT_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_täv ;
+V:%^WGStem FRONT_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;




LEXICON V_51NÕSÕMA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ nõsõma:nõs
!! * Yaml: __nwswma51__
!! cf. tulõma
+V:õ BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V:õ BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V:õ BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V:%{XC%} V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
+V:õ BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V:%{XC%} V0-IND-PRT-SCSG3_i ;
+V:%{XC%} BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-SCPL3_vaq ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V:õ BACK_INF_ma ;
+V: BACK_INF_daq ;
+V:õ BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V:%^VOWLower BACK_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nuq ;
+V: BACK_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_tav ;
+V:%^WGStem BACK_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;

LEXICON V_51PÄSEMÄ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ päsemä:päs
!! * Yaml: __paesemae51__
!! cf. tulõma
+V:e FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V:e FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V:e FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V:%{XC%} V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
+V:e FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V:%{XC%} V0-IND-PRT-SCSG3_i ;
+V:%{XC%} FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-SCPL3_väq ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V:e FRONT_INF_mä ;
+V: FRONT_INF_däq ;
+V:e FRONT_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V:%^VOWLower FRONT_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nüq ;
+V: FRONT_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_täv ;
+V:%^WGStem FRONT_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;

LEXICON V_52ALOSTÕLLÕMA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ alostõllõma:alostõl
!! * Yaml: __alostwllwma52__
+V:%{XC%}õ BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V:õ BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V:õ BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V:%{XC%}õ BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
+V:õ BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V: V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
+V:%{XC%} V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
+V:õ BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V: V0-IND-PRT-SCSG3_i ;
+V:%{XC%} V0-IND-PRT-SCSG3_i ;
+V:%{XC%} BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-SCPL3_vaq ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V:õ BACK_INF_ma ;
+V:%{XC%}õ BACK_INF_ma ;
+V:%{XC%} BACK_INF_aq ;
+V:õ BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V:%^VOWLower BACK_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nuq ;
+V: BACK_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_tav ;
+V:%^WGStem BACK_JUUMA-PSS-PRF-PRC_d ;

LEXICON V_52EHITELLEMÄ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ehitellemä:ehitel
!! ehitellemä:ehitel
!! * Yaml: __ehitellemae52__
+V:%{XC%}e FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V:e FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V:e FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V:%{XC%}e FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
+V:e FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V: V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
+V:%{XC%} V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
+V:e FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V: V0-IND-PRT-SCSG3_i ;
+V:%{XC%} V0-IND-PRT-SCSG3_i ;
+V:%{XC%} FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-SCPL3_väq ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V:e FRONT_INF_mä ;
+V:%{XC%}e FRONT_INF_mä ;
+V:%{XC%} FRONT_INF_äq ;
+V:e FRONT_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V:%^VOWLower FRONT_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nüq ;
+V: FRONT_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_täv ;
+V:%^WGStem FRONT_JUUMA-PSS-PRF-PRC_d ;


LEXICON V_53JÄÄMÄ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ 
+V+WORK: # ;

LEXICON V_54ISTMA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ 
+V+WORK: # ;
LEXICON V_55KÕNÕLÕMA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ kõnõlõma:kõnõl
!! * Yaml: __kwnwlwma55__
+V:õ BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V:õ BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V:õ BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V: V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
+V:õ BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V: BACK_IND-PRT-SCSG3_APOSTROPHE ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-SCPL3_vaq ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V:õ BACK_INF_ma ;
+V: BACK_INF_daq ;
+V:õ BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nuq ;
+V: BACK_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_tav ;
+V:%^WGStem BACK_JUUMA-PSS-PRF-PRC_d ;

LEXICON V_55HÄRELEMÄ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ härelemä:härel
!! * Yaml: __haerelemae55__
+V:e FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V:e FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V:e FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V: V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
+V:e FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V: FRONT_IND-PRT-SCSG3_APOSTROPHE ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-SCPL3_väq ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V:e FRONT_INF_mä ;
+V: FRONT_INF_däq ;
+V:e FRONT_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nüq ;
+V: FRONT_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_täv ;
+V:%^WGStem FRONT_JUUMA-PSS-PRF-PRC_d ;


LEXICON V_56HIIBÕLÕMA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ hiibõlõma:hiibõl
!! * Yaml: __hiibwlwma56__
+V:õ BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V:õ BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V:ʼ V0-IND-PRS-SCSG3_ZERO ;
+V:BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SCPL3_iaq ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V: V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
+V:õ BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
!+V: V0-IND-PRT-SCSG3_i ;
+V: BACK_IND-PRT-SCSG3_APOSTROPHE ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-SCPL3_vaq ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V:õ BACK_INF_ma ;
+V: BACK_INF_daq ;
+V:õ BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V:%^VOWLower BACK_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nuq ;
+V: BACK_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_tav ;
+V:%^WGStem BACK_JUUMA-PSS-PRF-PRC_d ;
