src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON verbs
elämä:elä V_ELÄMÄ  "" ;
habalõma:habal V_55KÕNÕLÕMA  "" ;
habõlõma:habõl V_55KÕNÕLÕMA  "" ;
hajolõma:hajol V_55KÕNÕLÕMA  "" ;
heidüskellemä:heidüskel V_52EHITELLEMÄ  "" ;
heigotõllõma:heigotõl V_52ALOSTÕLLÕMA  "" ;
hereskellemä:hereskel V_52EHITELLEMÄ  "" ;
hilbõlõma:hilbõl V_56HIIBÕLÕMA  "" ;
hurisõma:huris V_50TONISÕMA  "" ;
härelemä:härel V_55HÄRELEMÄ  "" ;
häötellemä:häötel V_52EHITELLEMÄ  "" ;
hõlʼalõma:hõlʼal V_55KÕNÕLÕMA  "" ;
hüdisemä:hüdis V_50HELISEMÄ  "" ;
hürmütellemä:hürmütel V_52EHITELLEMÄ  "" ;
imemä:ime V_ELÄMÄ  "" ;
inisemä:inis V_50HELISEMÄ  "" ;
jaahutõllõma:jaahutõl V_52ALOSTÕLLÕMA  "" ;
jagõlõma:jagõl V_55KÕNÕLÕMA  "" ;
judisõma:judis V_50TONISÕMA  "" ;
jäselemä:jäsel V_55HÄRELEMÄ  "" ;
jäämä:jää V_53JÄÄMÄ  "" ;
kaema:kae V_53JÄÄMÄ  "" ;
kahisõma:kahis V_50TONISÕMA  "" ;
kaihkõlõma:kaihkõl V_52ALOSTÕLLÕMA  "" ;
kakkõlõma:kakkõl V_56HIIBÕLÕMA  "" ;
kasuma:kasu V_48KASUMA  "" ;
keeritellemä:keeritel V_52EHITELLEMÄ  "" ;
kidsisemä:kidsis V_50HELISEMÄ  "" ;
kiimä:kiimä V_53JÄÄMÄ  "" ;
kogahõllõma:kogahõl V_52ALOSTÕLLÕMA  "" ;
kolisõma:kolis V_50TONISÕMA  "" ;
krogisõma:krogis V_50TONISÕMA  "" ;
kudisõma:kudis V_50TONISÕMA  "" ;
kudõlõma:kudõl V_55KÕNÕLÕMA  "" ;
kuigõlõma:kuigõl V_56HIIBÕLÕMA  "" ;
kuioma:kuio V_48KASUMA  "" ;
kullõskõllõma:kullõskõl V_52ALOSTÕLLÕMA  "" ;
kusõma:kus V_51NÕSÕMA  "" ;
kuulma:kool V_49LÕPMA  "" ;
kägisemä:kägis V_50HELISEMÄ  "" ;
käristellemä:käristel V_52EHITELLEMÄ  "" ;
kõnõlõma:kõnõl V_55KÕNÕLÕMA  "" ;
kõrisõma:kõris V_50TONISÕMA  "" ;
kõõmõlõma:kõõmõl V_55KÕNÕLÕMA  "" ;
kõõrutõllõma:kõõrutõl V_52ALOSTÕLLÕMA  "" ;
küdsämä:küdsä V_ELÄMÄ  "" ;
kügelemä:kügel V_55HÄRELEMÄ  "" ;
kükütellemä:kükütel V_52EHITELLEMÄ  "" ;
külmämä:külmä V_ELÄMÄ  "" ;
libisemä:libis V_50HELISEMÄ  "" ;
lipõrdõllõma:lipõrdõl V_52ALOSTÕLLÕMA  "" ;
liugõlõma:liugõl V_56HIIBÕLÕMA  "" ;
lõdisõma:lõdis V_50TONISÕMA  "" ;
lõpma:lõp V_49LÕPMA  "" ;
lõõritõllõma:lõõritõl V_52ALOSTÕLLÕMA  "" ;
lüngelemä:lüngel V_55HÄRELEMÄ  "" ;
meeliskellemä:meeliskel V_52EHITELLEMÄ  "" ;
muhelõma:muhel V_55KÕNÕLÕMA  "" ;
mulisõma:mulis V_50TONISÕMA  "" ;
munõma:munõ V_ELÄMÄ  "" ;
mähälemä:mähäl V_55HÄRELEMÄ  "" ;
mõrisõma:mõris V_50TONISÕMA  "" ;
mõsiskõllõma:mõsiskõl V_52ALOSTÕLLÕMA  "" ;
mügisemä:mügis V_50HELISEMÄ  "" ;
nirisemä:niris V_50HELISEMÄ  "" ;
nurkõlõma:nurkõl V_56HIIBÕLÕMA  "" ;
nädselemä:nädsel V_55HÄRELEMÄ  "" ;
nägelemä:nägel V_55HÄRELEMÄ  "" ;
närbüskellemä:närbüskel V_52EHITELLEMÄ  "" ;
närelemä:närel V_55HÄRELEMÄ  "" ;
näselemä:näsel V_55HÄRELEMÄ  "" ;
nõgluma:nõglu V_48KASUMA  "" ;
nõrgutõllõma:nõrgutõl V_52ALOSTÕLLÕMA  "" ;
nõsõma:nõs V_51NÕSÕMA  "" ;
oppõlõma:oppõl V_56HIIBÕLÕMA  "" ;
palama:pala V_48PALAMA  "" ;
pilgutõllõma:pilgutõl V_52ALOSTÕLLÕMA  "" ;
pirisema:piris V_50TONISÕMA  "" ;
pirtskõlõma:pirtskõl V_56HIIBÕLÕMA  "" ;
plärisemä:pläris V_50HELISEMÄ  "" ;
plärtsellemä:plärtsel V_52EHITELLEMÄ  "" ;
proosiskõllõma:proosiskõl V_52ALOSTÕLLÕMA  "" ;
prõgisõma:prõgis V_50TONISÕMA  "" ;
päsemä:päs V_51PÄSEMÄ  "" ;
rabõlõma:rabõl V_55KÕNÕLÕMA  "" ;
rappõlõma:rappõl V_56HIIBÕLÕMA  "" ;
räbelemä:räbel V_55HÄRELEMÄ  "" ;
rägelemä:rägel V_55HÄRELEMÄ  "" ;
rägisemä:rägis V_50HELISEMÄ  "" ;
räpätellemä:räpätel V_52EHITELLEMÄ  "" ;
rõnkõlõma:rõnkõl V_56HIIBÕLÕMA  "" ;
rüselemä:rüsel V_55HÄRELEMÄ  "" ;
sadama:sada V_48PALAMA  "" ;
salalõma:salal V_55KÕNÕLÕMA  "" ;
salďma:salď V_54ISTMA  "" ;
sulama:sula V_48PALAMA  "" ;
sällütellemä:sälütel V_52EHITELLEMÄ  "" ;
sõgluma:sõglu V_48KASUMA  "" ;
sõgõlma:sõgõl V_48KASUMA  "" ;
sõnotõllõma:sõnotõl V_52ALOSTÕLLÕMA  "" ;
tappõlõma:tappõl V_56HIIBÕLÕMA  "" ;
tolmõlõma:tolmõl V_56HIIBÕLÕMA  "" ;
tsibisemä:tsibis V_50HELISEMÄ  "" ;
tsibistellemä:tsibistel V_52EHITELLEMÄ  "" ;
tsisisemä:tsisis V_50HELISEMÄ  "" ;
tsolisõma:tsolis V_50TONISÕMA  "" ;
tsöbisemä:tsöbis V_50HELISEMÄ  "" ;
tsʼagõlõma:tsʼagõl V_56HIIBÕLÕMA  "" ;
tõrõlõma:tõrõl V_55KÕNÕLÕMA  "" ;
tõõsitõllõma:tõõsitõl V_52ALOSTÕLLÕMA  "" ;
uigõlõma:uigõl V_56HIIBÕLÕMA  "" ;
vahelõma:vahel V_55KÕNÕLÕMA  "" ;
vibisemä:vibis V_50HELISEMÄ  "" ;
videlemä:videl V_55HÄRELEMÄ  "" ;
vigõlõma:vigõl V_55KÕNÕLÕMA  "" ;
vilistellemä:vilistel V_52EHITELLEMÄ  "" ;
viugõlõma:viugõl V_56HIIBÕLÕMA  "" ;
vurisõma:vuris V_50TONISÕMA  "" ;
värisemä:väris V_50HELISEMÄ  "" ;
